North Dakota statutes. TITLE 19 Foods, Drugs, Oils, and Compounds
CHAPTER 19-07 Eggs [Repealed]

19-07-01.
Eggs to be graded — Exemption. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1921, ch. 60, §§ 1, 3, 4; 1925 Supp., §§ 2863c1, 2863c3, 2863c4; R.C. 1943, § 19-0701; S.L. 1957, ch. 167, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 19-0701; S.L. 1985, ch. 258, § 29; 2017, ch. 191, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-07-02.
Rulemaking power. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1921, ch. 60, § 7; 1925 Supp., § 2863c7; R.C. 1943, § 19-0702; S.L. 1957, ch. 167, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 19-0702; S.L. 1971, ch. 237, § 1; 1979, ch. 187, § 30; 1981, ch. 336, § 12; 1983, ch. 254, § 2; 1991, ch. 224, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1997, ch. 67, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-07-03.
Egg advisory commission. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 237, § 2.

19-07-04.
Egg dealers’ licenses. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 254, § 11.

19-07-05.
Bond. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 264, § 15.

19-07-06.
Penalty. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1921, ch. 60, § 4; 1925 Supp., § 2863c4; R.C. 1943, § 19-0706; S.L. 1957, ch. 167, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 19-0706; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 178; 1983, ch. 254, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-07-07.
Candling — Maintaining adequate place for — Candling certificate. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1957, ch. 167, § 2.

19-07-08.
Candling record — Statement to seller. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1957, ch. 167, § 2.

19-07-09.
Contents of return statement of first buyer. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1957, ch. 167, § 2.

19-07-10.
Contents of return statement of subsequent buyers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1957, ch. 167, § 2.

19-07-11.
Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1957, ch. 167, § 2.